Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 6. Business and Export Assistance Program.

Administrative Code. —

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

For rural development initiative fund, see 3 AAC 170.

Sec. 44.88.500.
Business and export assistance guarantees.

Subject to the requirements of AS

44.88.500

—

44.88.599

, the authority may

guarantee new business and export assistance loans; and

guarantee new business and export assistance loans made to refinance existing loans.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988; am § 9 ch 111 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Sec. 44.88.502.
Effect of guarantee.

A guarantee under AS

44.88.500

—

44.88.599

does not create a debt or liability of the state.

A guarantee under AS

44.88.500

may not be terminated, canceled, or revoked except under its terms. A guarantee held by a participating financial institution is presumed to be valid.

A guarantee or portion of a guarantee under AS

44.88.500

that relates to an export transaction must guarantee against commercial and political loss, in whole or in part, of principal and interest. The authority may require the borrower to obtain insurance against some or all of the loss guaranteed under AS

44.88.500

. In this subsection, “political loss” means a loss incurred as a result of

a political risk that would be insurable under an export credit insurance policy issued by the Export-Import Bank of the United States; or

any other political risk that is actually insured under insurance the authority requires the borrower to obtain.

History.

(§ 10 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Sec. 44.88.505.
Qualifications of applicant for new loan guarantee.

A business enterprise may apply for a new loan guarantee under AS

44.88.500

(1).

The authority may establish additional applicant qualifications by regulation. These qualifications may vary depending upon the type of business the applicant is engaged in.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988; am § 11 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

Sec. 44.88.510.
Application for new loan guarantee.

An applicant for a new loan guarantee shall provide information that the authority may require by regulation. The authority may require submission of an economic benefit analysis prepared by a person acceptable to the authority.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

Sec. 44.88.515.
Qualifications of applicant for debt refinancing guarantee.

A business enterprise may apply under AS

44.88.500

(2) to guarantee the refinancing of existing debt.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988; am § 12 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

Sec. 44.88.520.
Application for debt refinancing guarantee.

An applicant for a debt refinancing guarantee shall provide the information that the authority may require by regulation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

Sec. 44.88.525.
Conditions of debt refinancing guarantee.

The authority may not guarantee refinanced debt

unless the refinancing

is necessary to extend substantial debt payments over a longer period of time, thereby improving the applicant’s net cash flow and working capital position consistent with the useful life of the assets being refinanced;

assists with short-term debt or cash expenditures when lenders will not extend reasonable longer terms to the applicant; and

creates additional economic opportunity or improves the viability of the borrower rather than just reducing the liability of the lender; or

unless the refinancing is necessary to place a permanent loan subsequent to an interim loan for financing of the project.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988; am § 13 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

Sec. 44.88.530.
Applicability of AS 44.88.535 — 44.88.560.

AS

44.88.535

—

44.88.560

apply to new loan guarantees and refinancing guarantees under AS

44.88.500

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988; am § 10 ch 111 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

Sec. 44.88.535.
Conditions of loan guarantee.

The authority may guarantee a loan under AS

44.88.500

—

44.88.599

if the

loan

is commercially reasonable;

contains payment provisions satisfactory to the authority;

is secured by adequate collateral; however, the authority may waive on a case-by-case basis the requirement of collateral for a loan guarantee of $100,000 or less for which the proposed loan term does not exceed five years, but the ability to waive the requirement of this subparagraph or the grant of a waiver does not prevent the financial institution that holds the loan guaranteed by the authority from requiring reasonable collateral for the loan;

borrower demonstrates the ability to repay the loan from either or both of the following:

net cash flow from the borrower; and

proceeds from the sale of current assets that are collateral for the loan if the sale, or receipt of proceeds from the sale, is an event that creates a payment obligation; in this subparagraph, “current asset” means property that will be or could be converted into cash in the normal operation of a business within one year;

term of the loan does not exceed 20 years;

loan is originated with and serviced by a state chartered or federally chartered financial institution;

portion of the loan not guaranteed by the authority is held by the originating financial institution or another institution approved by the authority;

loan is made to a business with a majority interest held by state residents; and

loan guarantee provides a benefit to the borrower.

The authority may provide a guarantee of up to 80 percent of a loan that qualifies under AS

44.88.500

—

44.88.599

. The ratio of the guarantee to the outstanding principal of the loan may not increase over the term of the loan.

The authority may guarantee the payment of interest on the guaranteed portion of a loan

in the manner established by the authority by regulation; and

for a period of time not to exceed

90 days for loans or parts of loans not made to support an export transaction;

180 days for loans or parts of loans made for a post-shipment loan guarantee to support an export transaction; in this subparagraph, “post-shipment loan guarantee” means a guarantee, or portion of a guarantee, that becomes effective after the export contract date that shipment of the related goods or raw materials or provision of the related services begins; or

270 days for loans or parts of loans made for a pre-shipment loan guarantee to support an export transaction; in this subparagraph, “pre-shipment loan guarantee” means a guarantee, or part of a guarantee, that becomes effective before the export contract date that shipment of the related goods or raw materials or provision of the related services begins.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988; am § 17 ch 123 SLA 1990; am §§ 2, 3 ch 25 SLA 1991; am § 11 ch 51 SLA 1992; am § 11 ch 111 SLA 1996; am §§ 14, 15 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5, ch. 25, SLA 1991 provides that “for a loan of $50,000 or less for which a loan guarantee was made from the business assistance fund of the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority before June 11, 1991, the authority may not increase the ratio of the guarantee to the outstanding principal of the loan in effect on June 11, 1991 over the term of the loan.”

Sec. 44.88.540.
Limitations of guarantees.

The authority may not issue a total of more than

$50,000,000 of loan guarantees;

$25,000,000 of loan guarantees in which the amount of the loan guarantee exceeds $500,000.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988; am § 12 ch 111 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

Sec. 44.88.542.
Discounted loan purchases. [Repealed, § 21 ch 111 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 44.88.545.
Limitations of guarantees with respect to borrowers.

The authority may not provide a guarantee

of more than $1,000,000;

to an individual borrower that cumulatively, with the outstanding principal balance of other authority guaranteed indebtedness of that borrower, exceeds $1,000,000.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988; am § 19 ch 123 SLA 1990; am § 16 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

Sec. 44.88.550.
Interest on guaranteed loan.

The maximum interest rate that may be charged by a financial institution on a loan guaranteed by the authority is two and three-quarters percentage points above the prime rate.

If provision is made in the loan guarantee agreement, the interest rate on a loan guaranteed by the authority may increase or decrease in accordance with the changes in the prime rate.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988; am §§ 12, 13 ch 51 SLA 1992; am § 13 ch 111 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

Sec. 44.88.555.
Servicing of guaranteed loans.

The financial institution that holds a loan guaranteed by the authority under AS

44.88.500

—

44.88.599

shall

service the loan;

exercise diligence in collecting amounts due under the loan; and

comply with all requirements of the loan guarantee agreement.

Amounts received toward satisfaction of a default on a loan guaranteed under AS

44.88.500

—

44.88.599

shall be allocated between the lender and the fund according to the guaranteed percentage of the loan until the principal balance and accrued interest have been repaid.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988; am § 17 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Sec. 44.88.560.
Powers of the authority.

The authority may

adopt regulations to implement AS

44.88.500

—

44.88.599

;

establish terms and conditions for loan guarantees and refinancing agreements subject to the requirements of AS

44.88.500

—

44.88.599

;

make and execute contracts and other instruments to implement AS

44.88.500

—

44.88.599

;

charge reasonable fees that the authority may establish by regulation for the service it provides under AS

44.88.500

—

44.88.599

;

acquire real or personal property by purchase, transfer, or foreclosure when the acquisition is necessary to protect the authority’s interest in a loan or a loan guarantee;

exercise any other power necessary to implement AS

44.88.500

—

44.88.599

; and

to the extent the authority considers it to be in its best interest to do so, use money to pay expenses relating to the liquidation of collateral securing loans guaranteed by the authority.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988; am § 20 ch 123 SLA 1990; am § 14 ch 111 SLA 1996; am § 18 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For other powers of the authority, see AS

44.88.080

and

44.88.420

.

Administrative Code. —

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

Sec. 44.88.570.
Distribution of loans.

The authority shall distribute guarantees of new loans and guarantees of loans made to refinance existing loans under AS

44.88.500

—

44.88.599

to all regions of the state in an equitable manner.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

Sec. 44.88.599.
Definitions.

In AS

44.88.500

—

44.88.599

“export transaction” means a contract for the sale of goods, services, or raw materials that includes a term that requires the goods, services, or raw materials, in whole or in part, to be shipped to or provided in a foreign country.

“prime rate” means the lowest United States money center prime rate of interest that is published in the Wall Street Journal.

History.

(§ 2 ch 162 SLA 1988; am §§ 15, 21 ch 111 SLA 1996; am § 19 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (1) was enacted as (3). Renumbered in 1998.